District of Columbia statutes.
38-1202.09

Establishment as land-grant university.

(a)

In the administration of: (1) the Act of August 30, 1890 (7 U.S.C. §§ 321 to 326, and 328) (known as the Second Morrill Act); (2) the 10th paragraph under the heading “Emergency Appropriations” in the Act of March 4, 1907 (7 U.S.C. § 322) (known as the Nelson Amendment); (3) § 22 of the Act of June 29, 1935 (7 U.S.C. § 329) (known as the Bankhead-Jones Act); (4) the Act of March 4, 1940 (7 U.S.C. § 331); and (5) the Agricultural Marketing Act of 1946 (7 U.S.C. §§ 1621 to 1627); the University shall be considered to be a university established for the benefit of agriculture and the mechanic arts in accordance with the provisions of the Act of July 2, 1862 (7 U.S.C. §§ 301 to 305, 307, and 308) (known as the First Morrill Act); and the term “state” as used in the laws and provisions of law listed in clauses (1), (2), (3), (4) and (5) of this subsection shall include the District of Columbia.

(b)

In the administration of the Act of May 8, 1914 (7 U.S.C. §§ 341 to 346, and 347a to 349) (known as the Smith-Lever Act):

(1)

The University shall be considered to be a university established for the benefit of agriculture and the mechanic arts in accordance with the provisions of the Act of July 2, 1862 (7 U.S.C. §§ 301 to 305, 307, and 308); and

(2)

The term “state” as used in such Act of May 8, 1914, shall include the District of Columbia.

(c)

In lieu of an authorization of appropriations for the District of Columbia under § 3(c) of such Act of May 8, 1914, there is authorized to be appropriated such sums as may be necessary to provide cooperative agricultural extension work in the District of Columbia under such Act. Any reference in such Act (other than § 3(c) thereof) to funds appropriated under such Act shall in the case of the District of Columbia be considered a reference to funds appropriated under this subsection.

(d)

Four per centum of the sums appropriated under subsection (c) of this section for each fiscal year shall be allotted to the Federal Extension Service of the Department of Agriculture for administrative, technical, and other services provided by the Service in carrying out the purposes of this section.

(e)

Reserved.

History

Oct. 26, 1974, 88 Stat. 1428, Pub. L. 93-471, title II, § 208
renumbered § 209, Nov. 1, 1975, D.C. Law 1-36, § 4, 22 DCR 2911
May 22, 2008, 122 Stat. 923, Pub. L. 110-234, § 7417(a)

Section References

This section is referenced in § 38-1202.10.

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 31-1518.
1973 Ed., § 31-1719.

Effect of Amendments

Pub. L. 110-234, in subsec. (b)(2), deleted “, except that the District of Columbia shall not be eligible to receive any sums appropriated under § 3 of such act” following “Columbia”; and, in subsec. (c), deleted the former second sentence, which had read as follows: “ Such sums may be used to pay no more than one half of the total cost of providing such extension work.”

Effective Dates

Section 7417(b) of Pub. L. 110-234 provided that the amendments made by this section take effect on October 1, 2008.

References in Text

“Section 3 of such Act,” referred to in subsection (b)(2) and in the first sentence of (c) of this section, is codified at 7 U.S.C. § 343.

Editor's Notes

Investment Advisory Committee for Land Grants Funds established: See Mayor’s Order 83-129, May 17, 1983.